Hawaii statutes.
§712A-9 Commencement of proceedings.
(1) The prosecuting attorney shall determine whether it is probable that the
property is subject to forfeiture and, if so, shall initiate administrative or
judicial proceedings against the property within forty-five days of receipt of
a written request for forfeiture from a seizing agency. If, on inquiry and
examination, the prosecuting attorney determines, with sole discretion, that
the proceedings probably cannot be sustained or that justice does not require
the institution of proceedings, the prosecuting attorney shall notify the
seizing agency, and as soon as practicable authorize the release of the seizure
for forfeiture on the property or on any specified interest in it. A
determination by the prosecuting attorney to forego initiation of proceedings
shall not be a bar to initiation of proceedings against the same property based
on the same circumstances at a later time.

(2) If the property sought to be forfeited is
real property, including fixtures, the prosecuting attorney shall file a lis
pendens with respect to the property but shall not be required to pay a filing
fee. [L 1988, c 260, pt of §1, §7; am L 1990, c 197, §1; am L 1991, c 166, §4;
am L 1993, c 196, §1; am L 1996, c 104, §6]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next